en: Blackcurrant mustards
es: Mostazas con grosellas negras, Mostazas con zarzaparrillas negras
fr: Moutardes au cassis
hr: Gorušice od crnog ribiza
lt: Juodųjų serbentų padažai
nl: Cassismosterds

en: Curry mustards
da: Karrysennepper
fr: Moutardes au curry
hr: Curry senfovi
lt: Kario garstyčios
nb: Karisenneper
nn: Karisennepar
sv: Currysenap

en: Yellow mustards
de: Gelbe Senfe
fr: Moutardes jaunes
hr: Žute gorušice
ja: イエローマスタード
lt: Geltonos garstyčios

en: Dijon mustards
bg: Дижонска горчица
de: Dijon-Senfe, Dijon-Senf
es: Mostazas de Dijon
fi: Dijon-sinapit
fr: Moutardes de Dijon, moutarde de Dijon
hr: Dijon senf
hu: Dijoni mustárok
it: Senapi di Dijon
ja: ディジョンマスタード
lt: Dižono garstyčios
nl: Dijonmosterds
pl: Musztarda Dijon
ru: Дижонская горчица
sv: Dijonsenap

en: French mustards
bg: Френска горчица
fr: Moutardes françaises
hr: Francuski senfovi
lt: Prancūziškos garstyčios

en: German mustards
de: Deutsche Senfe, Deutscher Senf, Senfe aus Deutschland, Senf aus Deutschland
es: Mostazas alemanas
fr: Moutardes allemandes, Süßer Senf
hr: Njemački senfovi
hu: Német mustárok
lt: Vokiškos garstyčios
nl: Duitse mosterds
pl: Musztardy niemieckie

en: Fine mustards
de: Feine Senfe
es: Mostazas finas
fr: Moutardes fines, moutarde fine
hr: Fine gorušice
nl: Fijngemalen mosterds

en: Fines herbes mustards
es: Mostazas a las finas hierbas
fr: Moutardes aux fines herbes
hr: Fines herbes gorušice
nl: Kruidenmosterds

en: Bavarian mustards
de: Bayerische Senfe, Bayerischer Senf, Senfe aus Bayern, Senf aus Bayern
es: Mostazas de Baviera
fr: moutarde bavaroise, moutarde américaine
hr: Bavarske gorušice
lt: Bavariškos garstyčios
nl: Beierse mosterds
pl: Musztarda bawarska
pt: Mostarda da Baviera

en: Honey mustards
de: Honigsenfe, Honigsenf
es: Mostazas con miel
fi: hunajasinapit
fr: Moutardes au miel
hr: Med senfovi
hu: Mézes mustárok
it: Senape al miele
ja: ハニーマスタード
lt: Medaus garstyčios
nl: Honingmosterds
pl: Musztarda miodowa

en: Old style mustards, Mustards with grains
es: Mostazas a la antigua
fi: vanhanaikaiset sinapit
fr: Moutardes à l’ancienne, moutarde à l’ancienne
hr: Starinski senfi
hu: Régi stílusú mustárok
it: Senape tradizionale, Senape alla vecchia maniera, Senape old style
lt: Senoviško stiliaus garstyčios
nl: Grove mosterds

en: Provençale mustards, Provençal mustards, Provencale mustards, Provencal mustards
es: Mostazas provenzales
fr: Moutardes provençales
hr: Provansalske senfove
nl: Provencaalse mosterds

en: Sweet mustards
de: Süße Senfe, Süßer Senf
es: Mostazas dulces
fi: Makeat sinapit
fr: Moutardes douces
hr: Slatke gorušice
hu: Édes mustár
it: Senapi dolci
nl: Zoete mosterds
pl: Musztardy słodkie

en: Sweet and strong mustards, Sweet and spicy mustards, Sötstark mustards
fi: Sinappi makea-väkevä
sv: Sötstarka senap, Sötstark senap

en: Tomato mustards
es: Mostazas con tomate
fr: Moutardes à la tomate
hr: Paradajz gorušice
hu: Paradicsomos mustár
nl: Tomatenmosterds

en: Violet mustards
es: Mostazas violetas
fr: Moutardes violettes, Moutardes à la violette
hr: Ljubičaste gorušice
nl: Viooltjesmosterds

en: Horseradish mustards
fr: Moutardes au Raifort

en: Pasta sauces
bg: Паста сосове
ca: Salsa per pasta
de: Nudelsoßen, Nudelsoße, Nudelsaucen, Nudelsauce
es: Salsas para pastas, Salsas para pasta
fi: pastakastikkeet
fr: Sauces pour pâtes, Sauce pour pâtes
he: רטבים לפסטה
hr: Umaci za tjesteninu
hu: Tészta szószok
it: Sughi per pasta
ja: パスタソース
lt: Padažai makaronams
nl: Pastasauzen
sv: Pastasåser

en: Arrabbiata sauces
bg: Сос Арабиата
de: Arrabiata-Soßen, Arrabiata-Soße, Arrabiata-Saucen, Arrabiata-Sauce
es: Salsas Arrabbiata, Salsa arrabbiata, Arrabbiatas
fi: Arrabbiata-kastikkeet
fr: Sauces Arrabiata, sauce arrabiata, Arrabiata
hr: arrabbiata umaci, arrabbiata umak
it: Salsa all'arrabbiata
ja: アラビアータ
nl: Arrabiatasauzen
sv: Arrabiatasåser

en: Meat-based pasta sauces, Tomato sauce with meat
de: Nudelsaucen auf Fleischbasis, Tomatensauce mit Fleisch
es: Salsas para pasta a base de carne, Salsas para pasta con carne
fi: Lihapohjaiset pastakastikkeet
fr: Sauce tomate à la viande
hr: Umaci za tjesteninu na bazi mesa
it: Sughi a base di carne
lt: Pomidorų padažai su mėsa
nl: Pastasauzen met vlees